Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-707
Initiating and responding tribunal of this state.

Under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, a tribunal of this state may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state or a foreign country.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 7.